Wyoming, session 2026, HB0085.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-6-130(b) and by creating a new
subsection (c) is amended to read:

22-6-130. Post-election ballot audit.

(b) Each county clerk shall conduct an audit of the
election using the statistically significant ballot sample
HB0085

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0250
size and the corresponding ballots for the contests
selected for audit determined under subsection (a) of this
section and shall cause minutes of the audit to be taken.
Each county clerk shall provide the audit results and the
minutes to the secretary of state not later than one (1)
day before the meeting of the state canvassing board as
provided in W.S. 22-16-118.

(c) The county clerk shall notify the county chairman
of each political party having a candidate on the ballot
and all independent candidates of the time and place of the
audit required under this section. Not less than two (2)
electors in the county, who shall be representatives of
different political parties, shall be present during the
audit to observe the audit procedures and the results of
the audit. Additional political party representatives and
representatives of independent candidates may be present
while the audit is conducted. Each person present to
observe the audit under this subsection shall take the oath
for election officials as provided in W.S. 21-8-115. If an
insufficient number of representatives are available as
required under this subsection, the county clerk may
appoint one (1) or more representatives of different
HB0085

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0250
political parties as necessary to meet the audit
observation requirements of this subsection.
Representatives observing the audit under this section
shall be given the opportunity to register any observed
errors or other objections to the audit with the county
clerk and the county clerk shall provide those registered
statements, and any response to the statements, to the
secretary of state at the time the audit results are
submitted under subsection (b) of this section.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0085